Wyoming statutes. Title 26 Insurance Code
Article 4. Disclosure of Material Transactions

§ 26-3-401.
Report of material transactions.

Every insurer domiciled in this state, and effective July 1, 1996, every authorized foreign insurer not subject to a substantially similar provision in its domicile, shall file a report with the commissioner disclosing material acquisitions and dispositions of assets or material nonrenewals, cancellations or revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements unless the acquisitions and dispositions of assets or material nonrenewals, cancellations or revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements have been submitted to the commissioner for review, approval or information purposes pursuant to other provisions of the insurance code, department regulations or other requirements.

The report required in subsection (a) of this section is due within fifteen (15) days after the end of the calendar month in which any of the transactions occur.

One (1) complete copy of the report, including any exhibits or other attachments filed as part of the report, shall be filed with:

The department; and

The National Association of Insurance Commissioners.

All reports obtained by or disclosed to the commissioner pursuant to this article shall be given confidential treatment, and shall not be made public by the commissioner, the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, or any other person, except:

To persons as authorized by and in accordance with the provisions of W.S. 26-2-113(d);

Upon the prior written consent of the insurer to which it pertains; or

If the commissioner, after giving the insurer who would be affected, notice and an opportunity to be heard, determines the interest of policyholders, shareholders or the public will be served by publication of the report, the commissioner may publish all or any part of the report he deems appropriate.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1; 2001, ch. 9, § 1.

§ 26-3-402.
Acquisitions and dispositions of assets.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, asset acquisitions subject to this article include every purchase, lease, exchange, merger, consolidation, succession or other acquisition other than the construction or development of real property by or for the reporting insurer or the acquisition of materials for such purpose.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, asset dispositions subject to this article include every sale, lease, exchange, merger, consolidation, mortgage, assignment for the benefit of creditors or otherwise, abandonment, destruction or other disposition.

No acquisition or disposition of assets shall be reported pursuant to W.S.

26-3-401

if the acquisition or disposition is not material. A material acquisition, disposition or the aggregate of any series of related acquisitions or dispositions during any thirty (30) day period, is one which is:

Nonrecurring;

Not in the ordinary course of business; and

Involves more than five percent (5%) of the reporting insurer’s total admitted assets as reported in its most recent statutory statement filed with the insurance department of the insurer’s state of domicile.

The following information is required to be disclosed in any report of a material acquisition or disposition of assets:

Date of the transaction;

Manner of acquisition or disposition;

Description of the assets involved;

Nature and amount of the consideration given or received;

Purpose of, or reason for, the transaction;

Manner by which the amount of consideration was determined;

Gain or loss recognized or realized as a result of the transaction; and

Name of the person from whom the assets were acquired or to whom they were disposed.

Insurers are required to report material acquisitions and dispositions on a nonconsolidated basis unless the insurer is part of a consolidated group of insurers which utilizes a pooling arrangement or one hundred percent (100%) reinsurance agreement that affects the solvency and integrity of the insurer’s reserves and the insurer ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to the pool. An insurer is deemed to have ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to a pool if:

The insurer has less than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) total direct plus assumed written premiums during a calendar year that are not subject to a pooling arrangement; and

The net income of the business not subject to the pooling arrangement represents less than five percent (5%) of the insurer’s capital and surplus.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1.

§ 26-3-403.
Nonrenewals, cancellations or revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements.

No nonrenewal, cancellation or revision of ceded reinsurance agreements need be reported pursuant to W.S.

26-3-401

if the nonrenewal, cancellation or revision is not material. For purposes of this article, a material nonrenewal, cancellation or revision is one that affects for property and casualty business, including accident and health business when written as such, more than fifty percent (50%) of an insurer’s ceded written premium, or for life, annuity and accident and health business, more than fifty percent (50%) of the total reserve credit taken for business ceded, on an annualized basis as indicated in the insurer’s most recently filed statutory statement. No filing is required if the insurer’s ceded written premium or the total reserve credit taken for business ceded represents, on an annualized basis, less than ten percent (10%) of direct plus assumed written premium or ten percent (10%) of the statutory reserve requirement prior to any cession, respectively.

Subject to subsection (a) of this section, a report shall be filed without regard to which party has initiated the nonrenewal, cancellation or revision of ceded reinsurance whenever one (1) or more of the following conditions exist:

The entire cession has been canceled, nonrenewed or revised and ceded indemnity and loss adjustment expense reserves after any nonrenewal, cancellation or revision represent less than fifty percent (50%) of the comparable reserves that would have been ceded had the nonrenewal, cancellation or revision not occurred;

An authorized or accredited reinsurer has been replaced on an existing cession by an unauthorized reinsurer; or

Collateral requirements previously established for unauthorized reinsurers have been reduced, including, but not limited to, the requirement to collateralize incurred but not reported claim reserves being waived with respect to one (1) or more unauthorized reinsurers newly participating in an existing cession.

Subject to subsection (a) of this section, for purposes of paragraphs (b)(ii) and (iii) of this section, a report shall be filed if the result of the revision affects more than ten percent (10%) of the cession.

The following information is required to be disclosed in any report of a material nonrenewal, cancellation or revision of ceded reinsurance agreements:

Effective date of the nonrenewal, cancellation or revision;

The description of the transaction with an identification of the initiator;

Purpose of, or reason for, the transaction; and

If applicable, the identity of the replacement reinsurers.

Insurers are required to report all material nonrenewals, cancellations or revisions of ceded reinsurance agreements on a nonconsolidated basis unless the insurer is part of a consolidated group of insurers which utilizes a pooling arrangement or one hundred percent (100%) reinsurance agreement that affects the solvency and integrity of the insurer’s reserves and the insurer ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to the pool. An insurer is deemed to have ceded substantially all of its direct and assumed business to a pool if the insurer has less than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) total direct plus assumed written premiums during a calendar year which are not subject to a pooling arrangement and the net income of the business not subject to the pooling arrangement represents less than five percent (5%) of the insurer’s capital and surplus.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 76, § 1.